Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1368
Agency plan;
reviewed; noncompliance; effect; report.

Each
agency plan shall be reviewed by the office and approved or disapproved after
submission. In every case when noncompliance is indicated, efforts shall be
made to secure compliance through a corrective action plan. A specific commitment
shall be put forth in writing. The commitment shall indicate the precise action
to be taken and dates for completion. The time period allowed shall be no
longer than thirty calendar days to effect the desired change. If an agency's
plan does not comply with the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated
by the office or if the agency's goals and timetables are not being met, the
office shall meet with the director of the agency to discuss the deficiencies. Agency directors shall take responsibility for
all noncompliance within their particular agency. In all cases when such corrective
action plan does not resolve the noncompliance, the office shall report such noncompliance to the
Governor. Such report shall be in writing and shall be made available to the
news media at the same time that it is submitted to the Governor. The Governor
shall take appropriate action to resolve the noncompliance elements and issues
which were cited by the office.

Laws 1979, LB 500, § 14;

Laws 1987, LB 491, § 23;

Laws 2013, LB78, § 19.